Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 64
COLORADO UNIFORM PARTNERSHIP ACT (1997)

Cross references:

For the "Uniform Partnership Law", see article 60 of this title.

Law reviews:

For article, "Limited Liability Partnerships and Other Entities Authorized in

C

olorado", see 24

C

olo. Law. 1525 (1995); for article, "Colorado Choice of Entity 1998", see 27 Colo. Law. 5 (June 1998); for article, "Contractually Binding Colorado Entities", see 28 Colo. Law. 33 (Dec. 1999); for article, "Colorado Choice of Form of Organization and Structure 2001", see 30 Colo. Law. 11 (Oct. 2001); for article "Entity and Trade Name Registration: 2001 Update", see 30 Colo. Law. 81 (Oct. 2001); for article "Entity and Trade Name Registration: 2004 Update", see 34 Colo. Law. 11 (Jan. 2005); for comment, "An Old View of the Cathedral: Intellectual Property Under the Colorado Uniform Partnership Act", see 91 U. Colo. L. Rev. 1247 (2020).

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 NATURE OF PARTNERSHIP

PART 3 RELATIONS OF PARTNERS TO PERSONS DEALING WITH PARTNERSHIP

PART 4 RELATIONS OF PARTNERS TO EACH OTHER AND TO PARTNERSHIP

PART 5 TRANSFEREES AND CREDITORS OF PARTNER

PART 6 PARTNER'S DISSOCIATION

PART 7 PARTNER'S DISSOCIATION WHEN BUSINESS NOT WOUND UP

PART 8 WINDING UP PARTNERSHIP BUSINESS

PART 9 CONVERSIONS AND MERGERS

PART 10 LIMITED LIABILITY PARTNERSHIPS; LIMITED LIABILITY LIMITED PARTNERSHIPS; FOREIGN LIMITED LIABILITY PARTNERSHIPS; FOREIGN LIMITED LIABILITY LIMITED PARTNERSHIPS

PART 11 FILING DOCUMENTS

PART 12 MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS